Missouri, session 2026, HB2132.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 149.192, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 149.192, to read as follows:
149.192. [The general assembly hereby occupies and preempts the entire field of
legislation increasing the taxation of cigarettes and tobacco products to the complete
exclusion of any order, ordinance or regulation by any political subdivision of this state. Any
future orders, ordinances or regulations in this field shall be null and void. No county, city,
town, village, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state shall adopt any order,
ordinance or regulation increasing the tax levied on cigarettes and tobacco products. The tax
levied by any county, city, town, village, municipality, or other political subdivision of this
state shall not exceed the amount of tax levied on September 30, 1993.] Any political
subdivision may adopt an order, ordinance, or regulation increasing the tax levied on
cigarettes and tobacco products within the boundaries of such political subdivision,
provided that such political subdivision shall first receive approval from a majority of
the qualified voters of such political subdivision who are voting on the proposal for such
a tax increase. For purposes of this section, the term "political subdivision" shall
include any county, city, town, village, municipality, or other political subdivision of this
state.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.